tr: Bisiklet kilidi güvenlik sertifikası: ART 1 yıldız; ART 2 yıldız; ART 3 yıldız; ART 4 yıldız; ART 5 yıldız; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronz; Sold Secure Elmas; Sold Secure Altın; Sold Secure Gümüş; Varefakta; Diğer
nl: Fiets slot veiligheidscertificering: ART 1-ster; ART 2-sterren; ART 3-sterren; ART 4-sterren; ART 5-sterren; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Anders
hu: Kerékpárzár biztonsági tanúsítványa: ART 1 csillag; ART 2 csillag; ART 3 csillag; ART 4 csillag; ART 5 csillag; SBSC; Sold Secure bronz; Sold Secure gyémánt; Sold Secure arany; Sold Secure ezüst; Varefakta; Egyéb
sv: Säkerhetscertifiering för cykellås: ART 1 stjärna; ART 2 stjärnor; ART 3 stjärnor; ART 4 stjärnor; ART 5 stjärnor; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Övrigt
lt-LT: Dviračio spynos saugumo sertifikavimas: ART 1 žvaigždutė; ART 2 žvaigždutės; ART 3 žvaigždutės; ART 4 žvaigždutės; ART 5 žvaigždutės; SBSC; „Sold Secure Bronze“; „Sold Secure Diamond“; „Sold Secure Gold“; „Sold Secure Silver“; „Varefakta“; Kita
cs: Certifikace zabezpečení zámků jízdních kol: ART 1 hvězdička; ART 2 hvězdičky; ART 3 hvězdičky; ART 4 hvězdičky; ART 5 hvězdiček; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Jiné
fr: Certification de sécurité des antivols de vélo: ART 1 étoile; ART 2 étoiles; ART 3 étoiles; ART 4 étoiles; ART 5 étoiles; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Autre
sl-SI: Certifikat varnosti kolesarskih ključavnic: ART 1 zvezdica; ART 2 zvezdici; ART 3 zvezdice; ART 4 zvezdice; ART 5 zvezdic; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Drugo
fi: Polkupyörän lukon turvallisuussertifiointi: ART 1 -tähti; ART 2 -tähti; ART 3 -tähti; ART 4 -tähti; ART 5 -tähti; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Muu
pl: Certyfikacja zabezpieczenia rowerowego: ART 1 gwiazdka; ART 2 gwiazdki; ART 3 gwiazdki; ART 4 gwiazdki; ART 5 gwiazdek; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Inne
vi: Chứng nhận an ninh khóa xe đạp: ART 1 sao; ART 2 sao; ART 3 sao; ART 4 sao; ART 5 sao; SBSC; Sold Secure đồng; Sold Secure kim cương; Sold Secure vàng; Sold Secure bạc; Varefakta; Khác
th: ใบรับรองความปลอดภัยของล็อคจักรยาน: ART 1 ดาว; ART 2 ดาว; ART 3 ดาว; ART 4 ดาว; ART 5 ดาว; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Certificação de segurança de cadeado para bicicleta: ART 1 estrela; ART 2 estrelas; ART 3 estrelas; ART 4 estrelas; ART 5 estrelas; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Outros
el: Πιστοποίηση ασφαλείας κλειδαριάς ποδηλάτου: ART 1 αστέρι; ART 2 αστέρια; ART 3 αστέρια; ART 4 αστέρια; ART 5 αστέρια; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Άλλο
ko: 자전거 자물쇠 보안 인증: ART 1성; ART 2성; ART 3성; ART 4성; ART 5성; SBSC; Sold Secure 브론즈; Sold Secure 다이아몬드; Sold Secure 골드; Sold Secure 실버; Varefakta; 기타
ru: Сертификация безопасности велосипедного замка: ART 1 звезда; ART 2 звезды; ART 3 звезды; ART 4 звезды; ART 5 звезд; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Другое
da: Sikkerhedscertificering for cykellås: ART 1-stjerne; ART 2-stjerner; ART 3-stjerner; ART 4-stjerner; ART 5-stjerner; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Andet
de: Sicherheitszertifizierung für Fahrradschlösser: ART 1 Stern; ART 2 Sterne; ART 3 Sterne; ART 4 Sterne; ART 5 Sterne; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silber; Varefakta; Sonstige
en: Bicycle lock security certification: ART 1 star; ART 2 star; ART 3 star; ART 4 star; ART 5 star; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Other
es: Certificación de seguridad del candado de bicicleta: ART 1 estrella; ART 2 estrellas; ART 3 estrellas; ART 4 estrellas; ART 5 estrellas; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamante; Sold Secure Oro; Sold Secure Plata; Varefakta; Otro
hr-HR: Sigurnosna certifikacija brave za bicikl.: ART 1 zvjezdica; ART 2 zvjezdice; ART 3 zvjezdice; ART 4 zvjezdice; ART 5 zvjezdica; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Ostalo
nb: Sikkerhetssertifisering for sykkellåser: ART 1 stjerne; ART 2 stjerner; ART 3 stjerner; ART 4 stjerner; ART 5 stjerner; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Annet
it: certificazione di sicurezza per lucchetto per bicicletta: ART 1 stella; ART 2 stelle; ART 3 stelle; ART 4 stelle; ART 5 stelle; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Altro
zh-CN: 自行车锁安全认证: ART 1 星; ART 2 星; ART 3 星; ART 4 星; ART 5 星; SBSC; Sold Secure 铜级; Sold Secure 钻石级; Sold Secure 金级; Sold Secure 银级; Varefakta; 其他
pt-BR: Certificação de segurança do cadeado para bicicleta: ART 1 estrela; ART 2 estrelas; ART 3 estrelas; ART 4 estrelas; ART 5 estrelas; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Outro
ja: 自転車ロックのセキュリティ認証: ART 1スター; ART 2スター; ART 3スター; ART 4スター; ART 5スター; SBSC; Sold Secure ブロンズ; Sold Secure ダイヤモンド; Sold Secure ゴールド; Sold Secure シルバー; Varefakta; その他
sk-SK: Certifikácia bezpečnosti zámku bicykla: ART 1 hviezdička; ART 2 hviezdičky; ART 3 hviezdičky; ART 4 hviezdičky; ART 5 hviezdičiek; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Iné
ro-RO: Certificarea de securitate a antifurtului pentru biciclete: ART 1 stea; ART 2 stele; ART 3 stele; ART 4 stele; ART 5 stele; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Altele
zh-TW: 自行車鎖安全認證: ART 1 顆星; ART 2 顆星; ART 3 顆星; ART 4 顆星; ART 5 顆星; SBSC; Sold Secure 銅級; Sold Secure 鑽石級; Sold Secure 金級; Sold Secure 銀級; Varefakta; 其他
bg-BG: Сертификация за сигурност на заключване на велосипеди: ART 1 звезда; ART 2 звезди; ART 3 звезди; ART 4 звезди; ART 5 звезди; SBSC; Sold Secure Bronze; Sold Secure Diamond; Sold Secure Gold; Sold Secure Silver; Varefakta; Други